Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB24.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Off-Campus Student Housing Tenant Rights Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bill of rights." The student bill of rights provided for under section 3."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Institution of higher education." A public or private two-year or four-year or postsecondary institution of higher 12345678910111213141516 education in this Commonwealth that has been accredited at the college level by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.Section 3. Student bill of rights.(a) Creation.--The department shall create and distribute a bill of rights to institutions of higher education in this Commonwealth. The bill of rights shall include information about renting, including harassment and discrimination, and include the following rights:(1) To live in a habitable dwelling.(2) To residential privacy.(3) To a hearing prior to eviction.(4) To receive a writ of possession prior to eviction.(5) For an individual with disabilities to request reasonable accommodations.(6) To visitors.(7) To utility access.(b) Notice.--An institution of higher education shall distribute a bill of rights to each student who is enrolled at the institution of higher education, and each newly enrolled student thereafter. The institution of higher education shall provide to each student enrolled, along with the bill of rights, a list of the most recent contact information for the municipal code enforcement office where the institution of higher education is located and for all municipal code enforcement offices in adjacent municipalities.Section 4. Off-campus student certification course.(a) Course creation.--The department shall create an online course to educate new students of their rights as tenants.(b) Course requirements.--The following criteria shall apply 20250HB0024PN0005 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the online course under subsection (a):(1) The online course shall be one instructional session which can be viewed via a secure Internet website.(2) The online course shall provide:(i) Tenant rights provided under Federal, State or local law, ordinance or court precedent.(ii) The actions students may take when experiencing unsafe housing.(iii) Other relevant information the department deems appropriate for inclusion in the online course.(3) All students of the institution of higher education enrolled after the effective date of this paragraph shall be required to view the online course. Documentation of the successful completion of the online course by each student shall be maintained by the institution of higher education. An institution of higher education may charge a fee of not more than $50 to a student who fails to view the online course under this section by the end of the student's first semester.(4) An institution of higher education may create and administer the institution's own off-campus student certification online course. Written notification and all electronic files, documents and a completed copy of the online course must be provided to the department.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0024PN0005 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627